West Virginia, session 2025, HB2479.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. COUNTY AND MUNICIPAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES. §7-12-3. Management and control of county authority vested in board; appointment and terms of members; vacancies; removal of members. The management and control of a county authority, its property, operations, business, and affairs shall be lodged in a board of not fewer than 12 seven nor more than 21 persons who shall be appointed by the county commission and be known as members of the authority. The county commission shall appoint one member to represent the county commission on the board. Members of the board shall be appointed by the county commission. The members of the authority first appointed shall serve respectively for terms of one year, two years and three years, divided equally or as nearly equal as possible between these terms. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for terms of three years each. A member may be reappointed for such additional term or terms as the county commission may deem proper. If a member resigns, is removed or for any other reason his or her membership terminates during his or her term of office, a successor shall be appointed by the county commission to fill out the remainder of his or her term. Members in office at the expiration of their respective terms shall continue to serve until their successors have been appointed and have qualified. The county commission may at any time remove any member of the board by an order duly entered of record and may appoint a successor member for any member so removed.Other persons, firms, unincorporated associations, and corporations, who reside, maintain offices, or have economic interests in the county, are eligible to participate in and request the county commission to appoint members to the development authority as the said authority shall by its bylaws provide. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home